pt-PT: Banda de Wi-Fi: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Banda dupla (2,4 GHz/5 GHz); Banda única (2,4 GHz); Banda única (60 GHz); Banda tripla (2,4 GHz/5 GHz/5 GHz); Banda tripla (2,4 GHz/5 GHz/6 GHz); Banda tripla (2,4 GHz/5 GHz/60 GHz); Outro
vi: Băng tần Wi-Fi: 2.4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Băng tần kép (2.4 GHz/5 GHz); Băng tần đơn (2.4 GHz); Băng tần đơn (60 GHz); Ba băng tần (2.4 GHz/5 GHz/5 GHz); Ba băng tần (2.4 GHz/5 GHz/6 GHz); Ba băng tần (2.4 GHz/5 GHz/60 GHz); Khác
bg-BG: Wi-Fi лента: 2.4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Двулентов (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz); Еднолентов (2.4 GHz); Еднолентов (60 GHz); Трилентов (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Трилентов (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Трилентов (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Други
zh-CN: 无线网络频段: 2.4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; 双频段（2.4 GHz / 5 GHz）; 单频段 (2.4 GHz); 单频段 (60 GHz); 三频段（2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz）; 三频段（2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz）; 三频段（2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz）; 其他
de: WLAN-Band: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Dual-Band (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz); Single-Band (2.4 GHz); Single-Band (60 GHz); Tri-Band (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Tri-Band (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Tri-Band (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Sonstiges
it: Banda Wi-Fi: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Doppia banda (2,4 GHz/5 GHz); Banda singola (2,4 GHz); Banda singola (60 GHz); Tribanda (2,4 GHz/5 GHz/5 GHz); Tribanda (2,4 GHz/5 GHz/6 GHz); Tribanda (2,4 GHz/5 GHz/60 GHz); Altro
nl: Wi-Fi-band: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Dual-band (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz); Single-band (2,4 GHz); Single-band (60 GHz); Tri-band (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Tri-band (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Tri-band (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Andere
ja: Wi-Fiバンド: 2.4GHz; 5GHz; 6GHz; 60GHz; デュアルバンド (2.4GHz/5GHz); シングルバンド (2.4GHz); シングルバンド (60GHz); トライバンド (2.4GHz/5GHz/5GHz); トライバンド (2.4GHz/5GHz/6GHz); トライバンド (2.4GHz/5GHz/60GHz); その他
pt-BR: Wi-Fi Band: 2.4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Banda dupla (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz); Banda única (2,4 GHz); Banda única (60 GHz); Banda tripla (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Banda tripla (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Banda tripla (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Outro
ro-RO: Bandă Wi-Fi: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Dual-band (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz); Single-band (2.4 GHz); Single-band (60 GHz); Tri-band (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Tri-band (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Tri-band (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Altele
th: แบนด์ไวไฟ: 2.4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; ย่านความถี่คู่ (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz); ย่านความถี่เดียว (2.4 GHz); ย่านความถี่เดียว (60 GHz); สามย่านความถี่ (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); สามย่านความถี่ (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); สามย่านความถี่ (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Pojas za Wi-Fi: 2,4 GHz; 5 Hz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Dvopojasni (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz); Jednopojasni (2,4 GHz); Jednopojasni (60 GHz); Tropojasni (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Tropojasni (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Tropojasni (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Ostalo
da: Wi-Fi-bånd: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Dual-band (2,4 GHz/5 GHz); Single-band (2,4 GHz); Single-band (60 GHz); Tri-band (2,4 GHz/5 GHz/5 GHz); Tri-band (2,4 GHz/5 GHz/6 GHz); Tri-band (2,4 GHz/5 GHz/60 GHz); Andet
es: Banda Wi-Fi: 2.4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Banda dual (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz); Banda única (2.4 GHz); Banda única (60 GHz); Tri-banda (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Tri-banda (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Tri-banda (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Otros
hu: Wi-Fi-sáv: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Kétsávos (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz); Egysávos (2.4 GHz); Egysávos (60 GHz); Háromsávos (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Háromsávos (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Háromsávos (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Egyéb
sk-SK: Wi-Fi pásmo: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Dvojpásmový (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz); Jednopásmový (2,4 GHz); Jednopásmový (60 GHz); Trojpásmový (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Trojpásmový (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Trojpásmový (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Iné
sl-SI: Wi-Fi kanal: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Dvopasovni (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz); Enopasovni (2,4 GHz); Enopasovni (60 GHz); Tripasovni (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Tripasovni (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Tripasovni (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Drugo
tr: Wi-Fi Bandı: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Çift bantlı (2,4 GHz/5 GHz); Tek bantlı (2,4 GHz); Tek bantlı (60 GHz); Üç bantlı (2,4 GHz/5 GHz/5 GHz); Üç bantlı (2,4 GHz/5 GHz/6 GHz); Üç bantlı (2,4 GHz/5 GHz/60 GHz); Diğer
en: Wi-Fi band: 2.4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Dual-band (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz); Single-band (2.4 GHz); Single-band (60 GHz); Tri-band (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Tri-band (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Tri-band (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Other
ru: Диапазон Wi-Fi: 2,4 ГГц; 5 ГГц; 6 ГГц; 60 ГГц; Двухдиапазонный (2,4 ГГц/5 ГГц); Однодиапазонный (2,4 ГГц); Однодиапазонный (60 ГГц); Трехдиапазонный (2,4 ГГц/5 ГГц/5 ГГц); Трехдиапазонный (2,4 ГГц/5 ГГц/6 ГГц); Трехдиапазонный (2,4 ГГц/5 ГГц/60 ГГц); Другой
el: Εύρος συχνότητας wi-fi: 2.4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Διπλή ζώνη (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz); Μονής ζώνης (2,4 GHz); Μονής ζώνης (60 GHz); Τρι-μπάντα (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Τρι-μπάντα (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Τρι-μπάντα (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Άλλο
sv: Wi-Fi-band: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Dubbelband (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz); Enkelband (2,4 GHz); Enkelband (60 GHz); Tri-band (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Tri-band (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Tri-band (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Övrigt
lt-LT: Belaidžio ryšio juosta: 2.4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Dviejų juostų (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz); Vienos juostos (2.4 GHz); Vienos juostos (60 GHz); Trijų juostų (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Trijų juostų (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Trijų juostų (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Kita
cs: Wifi pásmo: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Dvoupásmová (2,4 GHz/5 GHz); Jednopásmová (2,4 GHz); Jednopásmová (60 GHz); Třípásmová (2,4 GHz/5 GHz/5 GHz); Třípásmová (2,4 GHz/5 GHz/6 GHz); Třípásmová (2,4 GHz/5 GHz/60 GHz); Jiné
nb: Wi-Fi-bånd: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Dobbelbånd (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz); Enkeltbånd (2,4 GHz); Enkeltbånd (60 GHz); Trippelbånd (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Trippelbånd (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Trippelbånd (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Annet
pl: Pasmo Wi-Fi: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Dwupasmowy (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz); Jednopasmowy (2,4 GHz); Jednopasmowy (60 GHz); Trójpasmowy (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Trójpasmowy (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Trójpasmowy (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Inne
fr: Bande Wi-Fi: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Bi-bande (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz); Monobande (2,4 GHz); Monobande (60 GHz); Tri-bande (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz); Tri-bande (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Tri-bande (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Autre
zh-TW: 網際網路無線連接系統頻段: 2.4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; 雙頻段 (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz); 單頻段 (2.4 GHz); 單頻段 (60 GHz); 三頻段 (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); 三頻段 (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); 三頻段 (2.4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); 其他
fi: Wi-Fi-kaista: 2,4 GHz; 5 GHz; 6 GHz; 60 GHz; Kaksikaistainen (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz); Yksikaistainen (2,4 GHz); Yksikaistainen (60 GHz); Kolmikaistainen (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 5 GHz); Kolmikaistainen (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 6 GHz); Kolmikaistainen (2,4 GHz / 5 GHz / 60 GHz); Muu
ko: Wi-Fi 대역: 2.4GHz; 5GHz; 6GHz; 60GHz; 듀얼 밴드(2.4GHz/5GHz); 싱글 밴드(2.4GHz); 싱글 밴드(60 GHz); 트라이 밴드(2.4GHz/5GHz/5GHz); 트라이 밴드(2.4GHz/5GHz/6GHz); 트라이 밴드(2.4GHz/5GHz/60GHz); 기타